District of Columbia statutes.
50-1101

Fee.

(a)

Except as otherwise currently provided in § 601 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations or as otherwise provided by the Council of the District of Columbia, all motor vehicles and trailers registered in the District of Columbia shall be inspected for safety and exhaust emissions at periodic intervals not more than 2 years apart. At the time of registration, or when otherwise established by the Director, an inspection fee shall be levied and collected for each motor vehicle or trailer. The Mayor may issue inspection stickers, without requiring safety and exhaust emissions inspections, for new motor vehicles and trailers not previously registered in any jurisdiction. The new vehicle inspections stickers may be valid for up to a 4-year period.

(b)

The Mayor may prescribe regulations and establish a fee to permit a person who owns a motor vehicle or trailer not required to be registered in the District of Columbia to have such motor vehicle or trailer inspected for safety or exhaust emissions in the District of Columbia.

(c)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor may exempt zero and ultra-low emission vehicles, as defined in Part 88 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, (40 C.F.R. 88.101.94 et seq.), from exhaust emissions inspections.

Feb. 18, 1938, 52 Stat. 78, ch. 31, § 1
July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 360, ch. 258, Art. IV, § 1
Oct. 12, 1968, 82 Stat. 1002, Pub. L. 90-567, § 1
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 174, Pub. L. 91-106, title IV, § 403
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-110, § 3, 23 DCR 8740
Feb. 25, 1978, D.C. Law 2-41, § 4, 24 DCR 3629
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-82, § 2, 29 DCR 159
Apr. 3, 1982, D.C. Law 4-97, § 8, 29 DCR 765
July 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-122, § 3, 29 DCR 2080
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-30, § 3, 38 DCR 4215
Apr. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-106, § 2(a), 41 DCR 1014
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-289, § 203(a), 48 DCR 2057
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 203, 54 DCR 903
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 6012, 55 DCR 7598
Registration of motor vehicles, fee schedules, see § 50-1501.03.
Regulation of traffic, power to promulgate regulations, see § 50-2201.03.
This section is referenced in § 50-1102 and § 50-2201.03.
1981 Ed., § 40-201.
1973 Ed., § 40-201.
D.C. Law 13-289, in subsec. (a), substituted “At the time of registration, or when otherwise established by the Director, an inspection fee shall be levied and collected for each motor vehicle or trailer.” for “At the time of the registration of each motor vehicle or trailer there shall be levied and collected an inspection fee which shall be included in and be a part of the total registration fee.”
D.C. Law 16-279, in subsec. (a), substituted “new motor vehicles and trailers” for “new passenger vehicles”; and added subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 17-219, in subsec. (a), substituted “valid for up to a 4-year period” for “valid for a 2-year period”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107 of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-19, June 21, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 5786).